Illinois, session 104th, SB2464.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Early Childhood Act is 5amended by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 3/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Department of Early Childhood Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 6-25-24.)